California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 318, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.43.

The application for registration under this article shall be on a form prescribed by the director and shall be accompanied by the fee as prescribed in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.44.

The application shall be verified and shall include the following:

(a) The full name, residence address, telephone number, and date of birth of the employee.

(b) The name, address, telephone number, and license number of the employer, and the date the employment commenced.

(c) A statement as to whether the employee has been arrested or convicted of a misdemeanor, excluding minor traffic violations.

(d) A statement as to whether the employee has been convicted of a felony.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.45.

The bureau, upon receipt of a criminal offense record or record of a subsequent arrest from the Department of Justice, shall make an immediate determination of fitness for registration of applicants for registration, when information contained in the records of the Department of Justice makes such a determination possible. Applications for registration of those determined to be unfit shall be immediately denied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.46.

(a) If the chief determines that an applicant’s criminal history contains arrest information for which no disposition appears, the chief shall issue a notice to the applicant allowing the applicant 45 days to provide documentation concerning the disposition of the arrest or arrests.

(b) The notice shall be sent to the applicant and shall provide sufficient information to assist the applicant in complying with the chief’s request. If the applicant fails to respond within 45 days, the applicant’s employment shall be automatically suspended until the bureau obtains the necessary documentation to approve or deny the application.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.47.

If the director determines that continued employment of an applicant or registrant, in his or her current capacity, may present an undue hazard to public safety, the licensee, upon proper notification from the director, shall suspend the applicant or registrant from employment in that capacity.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.48.

(a) Upon determining that the applicant is qualified for registration pursuant to this chapter, the bureau shall issue a pocket registration card to the employee. The applicant may request to be issued an enhanced pocket card that shall be composed of durable material and may incorporate technologically advanced security features. The bureau may charge a fee sufficient to reimburse the department for costs for furnishing the enhanced pocket card. The fee charged may not exceed the actual cost for system development, maintenance, and processing necessary to provide the service, and may not exceed six dollars ($6). If the applicant does not request an enhanced card, the department shall issue a standard card at no cost to the applicant.

(b) The registrant shall carry a valid registration card issued by the bureau under this section, and either a valid driver’s license issued pursuant to Section 12811 of the Vehicle Code or a valid identification card issued pursuant to Section 13000 of the Vehicle Code, at all times the registrant is engaged in the work of a locksmith whether on or off the premises of the licensee’s place of business. Every person, while engaged in any activity for which licensure is required, shall display his or her valid pocket card, and driver’s license or identification card, as provided by regulation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.49.

A licensee shall at all times be responsible for ascertaining that his or her employees subject to registration are currently registered or have made proper application for registration as provided in this article. The licensee shall not have in his or her employment a person performing the services of a locksmith whose registration has expired, or been revoked, denied, suspended, or canceled.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.50.

(a) All registrations shall be placed on a cyclical renewal and shall expire two years following the date of issuance or assigned renewal date.

(b) At least 60 days prior to the expiration of a registration, a registrant who desires to renew his or her registration shall forward to the bureau a copy of his or her current registration card, along with the renewal fee as set forth in this chapter.

(c) The licensee shall provide to any employee information regarding procedures for renewal of registration.

(d) An expired registration may still be renewed within 30 days from the date of expiration provided the registrant pays a delinquency fee provided by this chapter. A registration not renewed within 30 days following its expiration may not be renewed thereafter. The holder of an expired registration may obtain a new registration only on compliance with all the provisions of this chapter relating to the issuance of an original registration. The holder of an expired registration shall not engage in any activity requiring registration under this chapter until the bureau issues a renewal or new registration.

(e) If the renewed registration card has not been delivered to the registrant, prior to the date of expiration of the prior registration, the registrant may present evidence of renewal to substantiate continued registration, for a period not to exceed 90 days after the date of expiration.

(f) A registration shall not be renewed until any and all fines, not pending appeal, assessed by the chief or the director have been paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Conduct of Business [6980.53. - 6980.69.]

6980.53.

A locksmith licensed by the bureau shall be subject to the provisions of Sections 466.6 and 466.8 of the Penal Code requiring verification of identification of clients and maintenance of work orders containing required client information. A copy of each work order completed pursuant to Sections 466.6 and 466.8 of the Penal Code shall be retained for two years, shall include the name and license number of the locksmith performing the service, and shall be open to inspection by the bureau or any peace officer during business hours or submitted to the bureau upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.54.

(a) A locksmith licensed by the bureau shall be subject to the provisions of Section 466.6 of the Penal Code, and shall be able to duplicate any key for any vehicle from another key.

(b) A locksmith licensed by the bureau shall be subject to the provisions of Section 466.8 of the Penal Code, and shall be able to duplicate any key for a residence, commercial establishment, or personal property from another key, except as follows:

(1) Duplication is prohibited when a key is stamped, imprinted, marked, or incised with the wording “Do Not Duplicate” or “Unlawful To Duplicate” and includes the originator’s company name and telephone number.

(2) Duplication is prohibited when a key is a Restricted Key or a High Security Key and includes the originator’s company name and telephone number or registration number.

(History: Added by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 13.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.55.

(a) Any locksmith who knowingly and willfully opens any residence, or commercial establishment for another by any method involving an on-site inspection of a door or entrance, whether or not for compensation, shall obtain the street address of the residence or commercial establishment, and the signature of the person for whom the residence or commercial establishment was opened on a work order form. The following information regarding the person requesting entry to the residence or commercial property shall be recorded on a work order form:

(1) Name.

(2) Address.

(3) Telephone Number.

(4) Date of Birth.

(5) Driver’s license or identification number. A copy of each work order form shall be retained for two years, shall include the name and license number of the locksmith performing the service, and shall be open for inspection by any peace officer or by the bureau during business hours or submitted to the bureau upon request.

(b) Any locksmith who makes keys capable of opening a motor vehicle or personal property registered under the Vehicle Code for another by any method, whether or not for compensation, shall obtain the name, date of birth, and driver’s license number or identification number of the person requesting entrance, and the registration or identification number of the vehicle or personal property registered under the Vehicle Code for which entrance is requested. This information together with the date the service was performed, and the signature of the person requesting entrance, shall be set forth on a work order. A copy of each work order form shall be retained for two years, shall include the license number of the locksmith performing the service, and shall be open for inspection by a peace officer or by the bureau during business hours or submitted to the bureau upon request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.58.

A licensee shall at all times be responsible for those actions of his or her employees performed in violation of this chapter, when acting within the course and scope of his or her employment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.59.

(a) A licensee shall notify the bureau within 30 days of any change of its officers required to be named pursuant to Section 6980.21 and of the addition of any new partners. Applications, on forms prescribed by the director, shall be submitted by all new officers and partners. The director may deny the application of a new officer or partner if the director determines that the officer or partner has committed any act which constitutes grounds for the denial of a license pursuant to Section 6980.71.

(b) A Notice of Warning shall be issued for the first violation of this section. Thereafter, the director shall assess a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for each subsequent violation of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.60.

No licensee or employee shall conduct business from any location other than the location for which a license or branch office registration was issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.61.

No licensee shall conduct a business as an individual, partnership, or corporation, unless the licensee holds a valid license issued to the same individual, partnership, or corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.62.

(a) Each licensee shall maintain a file or record containing the name, address, commencing date of employment, and position of each employee, and the date of termination of employment when an employee is terminated. The files and records, together with usual payroll records, shall be available for inspection by the bureau, and copies thereof and information pertaining thereto or contained therein shall be submitted to the bureau upon written request.

(b) A licensee shall respond to the bureau’s request to forward copies of the files or records and information pertaining thereto or contained therein within 30 days of the bureau’s request.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.63.

Within seven days, each licensee shall verify proof of current and valid registration issued by the bureau for each employee who is subject to registration, or shall require an employee to complete and submit an application for registration, pursuant to Section 6980.42, after employing an individual who does not possess a current and valid registration from the bureau.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.64.

(a) Every advertisement by a licensee soliciting or advertising business shall contain his or her business name, business address, or business telephone number, and license number as they appear in the records of the bureau.

(b) For the purpose of this section, “advertisement” includes any business card, stationery, brochure, flyer, circular, newsletter, fax form, printed or published paid advertisement in any media form, directory listing, or telephone book listing.

(c) The director may assess a fine of five hundred dollars ($500) for the first violation of this section and one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each subsequent violation. These fines shall be deposited in the Private Security Services Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.65.

No licensee or person shall aid and abet an unlicensed or nonexempt locksmith in any activity for which a license is required. For purposes of this section, to aid or abet includes, but is not limited to, the falsification of documents or facilitation of the acquisition of locksmith tools. Any licensee or person found in violation of this section shall be subject to Section 6980.14. A person shall not be subject to this section if he or she reasonably relied on a copy of a license, registration, pocket registration, or pocket identification card.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 679, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.68.

No licensee shall willfully or deliberately disregard any building or safety laws of the state or any political subdivision thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.69.

No licensee shall fail in any material respect to complete the installation, repair, opening, or modification of a lock for the price stated in the contract for services.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Disciplinary Proceedings and Administrative Citations [6980.71. - 6980.77.]

6980.71.

(a) The director may deny a license or registration regulated by this chapter on the grounds that the applicant has done any of the following:

(1) Knowingly made a false statement of fact required to be revealed in the application for a license.

(2) Been convicted of a crime. A conviction within the meaning of this section means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. Any action which the bureau is permitted to take following the establishment of a conviction may be taken when the time for appeal has elapsed, or the judgment of conviction has been affirmed on appeal, or when an order granting probation is made suspending the imposition of sentence, irrespective of a subsequent order under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code.

(3) Committed any act involving dishonesty, fraud, or deceit, with the intent to substantially benefit himself, herself, or another, or to substantially injure another.

(4) Committed any act which, if done by a licensee, would be grounds for suspension or revocation of a license.

(5) Been refused a license under this chapter or had a license revoked.

(6) Been an officer, partner, or manager of any person who has been refused a license under this chapter or whose license has been suspended or revoked.

(b) The bureau may deny a license or registration pursuant to this section only if the crime or act is substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of the license or registration for which application has been made.

(c) The denial of a license or registration shall be in writing and shall describe the basis for the denial. The denial shall inform the applicant that if he or she desires a hearing in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the review shall be requested within 30 days of the issuance of the denial.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, no person shall be denied a license or registration solely on the basis that he or she has been convicted of a felony, if he or she has obtained a certificate of rehabilitation pursuant to Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 4852.01) of Title 6 of Part 3 of the Penal Code, or solely on the basis that he or she has been convicted of a misdemeanor, if he or she has met all applicable requirements of the criteria of rehabilitation as provided in Section 6980.72.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.72.

(a) When considering the denial, suspension, or revocation of a license or registration for which application has been made under this chapter, the chief, in evaluating the rehabilitation of the applicant and his or her present eligibility for a license or registration, shall consider all the following criteria:

(1) The nature and severity of the act or crime under consideration as grounds for denial.

(2) The applicant’s total criminal record.

(3) Evidence of any act committed subsequent to the act or crime under consideration as grounds for denial, suspension, or revocation which also could be considered as grounds for denial under Section 6980.71.

(4) The time that has elapsed since commission of the act or crime referred to in paragraph (1) or (2).

(5) The extent to which the applicant has complied with any terms of parole, probation, restitution, or any other sanctions lawfully imposed against the applicant.

(6) Evidence, if any, of rehabilitation submitted by the applicant.

(b) When considering a petition for reinstatement of a license or registration, the chief shall evaluate evidence of rehabilitation, considering those criteria of rehabilitation listed in subdivision (a).

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.73.

(a) The license or registration of a locksmith shall be automatically suspended if the locksmith is convicted of any crime which is substantially related to the functions, duties, and responsibilities of a locksmith. The automatic suspension shall be effectuated by the mailing of a notice of conviction and suspension of license to be sent by the bureau to the licensee at his or her address of record.

(b) The notice shall contain a statement of preliminary determination by the director or his or her designee that the crime stated is reasonably related to the functions, duties, and responsibilities of a locksmith.

(c) In enacting this section, the Legislature finds and declares that locksmiths convicted of crimes reasonably related to the functions, duties, and responsibilities of a locksmith shall be subject to automatic suspension of their license and that summary suspension is justified by compelling state interests of public safety and security within the meaning of the California Supreme Court’s decision in Eye Dog Foundation v. State Board of Guide Dogs for the Blind, 67 Cal. 2d 536.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.74.

(a) The bureau may suspend or revoke a license issued pursuant to this chapter for acts including, but not limited to, any of the following acts which shall also be unlawful:

(1) Misrepresentation or concealment of a material fact in a license application.

(2) Interference with authorized personnel engaged in the enforcement or administration of this chapter.

(3) Knowingly using or permitting the use of any of his or her skills, tools, or facilities for the commission of any crime.

(4) Conviction of a crime substantially related to the qualifications, functions, or duties of a locksmith.

(5) A violation of this chapter or the rules and regulations adopted under the authority of this chapter.

(b) The bureau may suspend or revoke a license issued to a corporation or to a partnership for the commission of any act listed in subdivision (a) by an officer of the corporation or by a partner in the partnership.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 568, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.75.

A record of conviction, or a certified copy thereof, shall be conclusive evidence of conviction.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.76.

The proceedings of the bureau to deny a license application, or to revoke or suspend a license, shall be conducted in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.77.

Notwithstanding any other law, the failure of any person licensed to do business as a corporation in this state to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State and the Franchise Tax Board after notice from the bureau shall result in the automatic suspension of the licensee by operation of law. The bureau shall notify the licensee in writing of its failure to be registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State or Franchise Tax Board, or both, and that the licensee shall be suspended 30 days from the date of the notice if the licensee does not provide proof satisfactory to the bureau that it is properly registered and in good standing with the Secretary of State or Franchise Tax Board, or both. Reinstatement may be made at any time following the suspension by providing proof satisfactory to the
 bureau that the license is properly registered and in good standing and the payment of the reinstatement fee as prescribed by this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 3.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Revenue [6980.79. - 6980.84.]

6980.79.

The fees prescribed by this chapter are those fixed in the following schedule:

(a) A locksmith license application fee shall be at least two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275).

(b) An original license fee for a locksmith license shall be at least two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275), and a renewal fee for a locksmith license shall be at least five hundred dollars ($500) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed five hundred fifty dollars ($550).

(c) A branch office initial registration
 fee shall be at least two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275), and a branch office renewal fee shall be at least one hundred fifty dollars ($150) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed one hundred sixty-five dollars ($165).

(d) Notwithstanding Section 163.5, the reinstatement fee as required by Section 6980.28 is the amount equal to the renewal fee plus a penalty of 50 percent thereof.

(e) An initial registration fee for an employee performing the services of a locksmith shall be at least fifty-five dollars ($55) and may be increased to an amount not to exceed sixty dollars ($60).

(f) A registration renewal fee for an employee performing the services of a locksmith shall be at least forty dollars ($40) and may be increased to an
 amount not to exceed forty-four dollars ($44).

(g) The fingerprint processing fee is that amount charged to the bureau by the Department of Justice.

(h) All applicants seeking a license pursuant to this chapter shall also remit to the bureau the fingerprint fee that is charged to the bureau by the Department of Justice.

(i) The fee for a Certificate of Licensure, as specified in Section 6980.24, shall be at least twenty-five dollars ($25).

(j) A delinquency fee is the amount equal to the renewal fee plus a penalty of 50 percent thereof.

(k) The fee for an endorsed verification of licensure or registration shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). The verification document shall include the
 license or registration number, the license or registration history and current status, the date of the endorsement, an embossed seal, and the signature of the chief.

(l) The fee for the replacement of a lost or destroyed registration card, license, or certificate authorized by this chapter shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). The request for a replacement of a registration card, license, or certificate shall be made in the manner prescribed by the bureau.

(m) The reinstatement fee following a suspension pursuant to Section 6980.77 shall be 25 percent of the renewal fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 376, Sec. 4.   (AB 830)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.80.

The initial application fee is considered an earned fee at the time an application for a license is received by the bureau. No refund shall be made to the applicant in the event that the applicant is found to lack the required qualifications, or is otherwise denied a license pursuant to this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.81.

(a) The bureau shall report each month to the Controller the amount and source of all revenue received pursuant to this chapter and shall pay the entire amount thereof into the State Treasury for credit to the Private Security Services Fund.

(b) All moneys paid into the Private Security Services Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be used for the purposes of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 17.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.82.

The director shall furnish one copy of the licensing law and rules and regulations to any applicant or licensee without charge. The director shall charge and collect a fee equivalent to the cost of producing such laws, rules and regulations, manuals, or guides, plus sales tax for each additional copy which may be furnished on request to any applicant or licensee, and for each copy furnished on request to any other person. All moneys derived pursuant to this section, except for any sales tax collected, shall be used to cover the costs of producing copies of these laws, rules and regulations, manuals, or guides. All moneys collected for sales tax shall be remitted to the State Board of Equalization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 18.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.83.

Application or licensee fees shall not be refunded except in accordance with Section 158.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------

6980.84.

(a) There shall be a separate budget and expenditure statement, and a separate revenue statement, outlining all moneys derived from, and expended for, the licensing and regulation of locksmiths and registrants in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

(b) If, at the end of any fiscal year, the moneys derived from the licensing of locksmiths and registrants is in surplus in an amount equal or greater than the moneys necessary for the regulation of locksmiths and registrants for the next two fiscal years, license or other fees shall be reduced during the following fiscal year by an amount that will reduce any surplus moneys derived from the licensing of locksmiths and registrants to an amount less than the moneys expended for the regulation of locksmiths and registrants for the next two fiscal years.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 1263, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1994.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Review [6981. - 6981.]

6981.

Notwithstanding any other law, the powers and duties of the bureau, as set forth in this chapter, shall be subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature. The review shall be performed as if this chapter were scheduled to be repealed as of January 1, 2029.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 484, Sec. 3.   (SB 1454)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 9. Contractors [7000. - 7191.]



  ARTICLE 1. Administration [7000. - 7021.]

7000.

This chapter constitutes, and may be cited as, the Contractors State License Law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 46.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7000.2.

Nothing in this code shall be interpreted to prohibit cities, counties, and cities and counties from requiring contractors to show proof that they are in compliance with local business tax requirements of the entity prior to issuing any city, county, or city and county permit. Nothing in this code shall be interpreted to prohibit cities, counties, and cities and counties from denying the issuance of a permit to a licensed contractor who is not in compliance with local business tax requirements.

Any business tax required or
 collected as part of this process shall not exceed the amount of the license tax or license fee authorized by Section 37101 of the Government Code or Section 16000 of the Business and Professions Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1992, Ch. 325, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

7000.5.

(a) There is in the Department of Consumer Affairs a Contractors State License Board, which consists of 15 members.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the repeal of this section renders the board subject to review by the appropriate policy committees of the Legislature.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 1.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7000.6.

Protection of the public shall be the highest priority for the Contractors State License Board in exercising its licensing, regulatory, and disciplinary functions. Whenever the protection of the public is inconsistent with other interests sought to be promoted, the protection of the public shall be paramount.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 312, Sec. 48.   (SB 1474)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

7001.

All members of the board, except the public members, shall be contractors actively engaged in the contracting business, have been so engaged for a period of not less than five years preceding the date of their appointment and shall so continue in the contracting business during the term of their office. No one, except a public member, shall be eligible for appointment who does not at the time hold an unexpired license to operate as a contractor.

The public members shall not be licentiates of the board.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1005, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7002.

(a) One member of the board shall be a general engineering contractor, two members shall be general building contractors, two members shall be specialty contractors, one member shall be a member of a labor organization representing the building trades, one member shall be an active local building official, and eight members shall be public members, one of whom shall be from a statewide senior citizen organization.

(b) No public member shall be a current or former licensee of the
 board or a close family member of a licensee or be currently or formerly connected with the construction industry or have any financial interest in the business of a licensee of the board. Each public member shall meet all of the requirements for public membership on a board as set forth in Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 450) of Division 1. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subdivision and those of Section 450, a representative of a labor organization shall be eligible for appointment to serve as a public member of the board.

(c) Each contractor member of the board shall be of recognized standing in his or her branch of the contracting business and hold an unexpired license to operate as a contractor. In addition, each contractor member shall, as of the date of his or her appointment, be actively engaged in the contracting business and have been so engaged for a period of not less than five years. Each contractor member shall remain
 actively engaged in the contracting business during the entire term of his or her membership on the board.

(d) Each member of the board shall be at least 30 years of age and of good character. In addition, each member shall have been a citizen and resident of the State of California for at least five years next preceding his or her appointment.

(e) For the purposes of construing this article, the terms “general engineering contractor,” “general building contractor,” and “specialty contractor” shall have the meanings given in Article 4 (commencing with Section 7055) of this chapter.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1005, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7003.

Except as otherwise provided, an appointment to fill a vacancy caused by the expiration of the term of office shall be for a term of four years and shall be filled, except for a vacancy in the term of a public member, by a member from the same branch of the contracting business as was the branch of the member whose term has expired. A vacancy in the term of a public member shall be filled by another public member. Each member shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of his or her successor or until the office is deemed to be vacant pursuant to
 Section 1774 of the Government Code, whichever first occurs.

Vacancies occurring in the membership of the board for any cause shall be filled by appointment for the balance of the unexpired term.

No person shall serve as a member of the board for more than two consecutive terms.

The Governor shall appoint four of the public members, including the public member who is from a statewide senior citizen organization, the local building official, the member of a labor organization representing the building trades, and the five contractor members qualified as provided in Section 7002. The Senate Rules Committee and the Speaker of the Assembly shall each appoint two public members.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1005, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7005.

The Governor may remove any member of the board for misconduct, incompetency or neglect of duty.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7006.

The board shall meet at least once each calendar quarter for the purpose of transacting business as may properly come before it. The board shall make every effort to make all regularly scheduled quarterly meetings of the board available as a webcast when the appropriate resources are available.

Special meetings of the board may be held at times as the board may provide in its bylaws. Four members of the board may call a special meeting at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 378, Sec. 2.   (SB 610)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

7007.

Eight members constitute a quorum at a board meeting.

Due notice of each meeting and the time and place thereof shall be given each member in the manner provided by the bylaws.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2000, Ch. 1005, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

7008.

The board may appoint such committees and make such rules and regulations as are reasonably necessary to carry out the provisions of this chapter. Such rules and regulations shall be adopted in accordance with the provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 891, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

7009.

Any member or committee of the board may administer oaths and may take testimony and proofs concerning all matters within the jurisdiction of the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7010.

The board is vested with all functions and duties relating to the administration of this chapter, except those functions and duties vested in the director under the provisions of Division I of this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1939, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------

7011.

(a) The board, by and with the approval of the director, shall appoint a registrar of contractors and fix the registrar’s compensation.

(b) The registrar shall be the executive officer and secretary of the board and shall carry out all of the administrative duties as provided in this chapter and as delegated to the registrar by the board.

(c) For the purpose of administration of this chapter, there may be appointed a deputy registrar, a chief reviewing and hearing officer, and, subject to Section 159.5, other assistants and subordinates as may be necessary.

(d) Appointments shall be made in accordance with the provisions of civil service
 laws.

(e) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 485, Sec. 2.   (SB 1455)   Effective January 1, 2025.   Repealed as of January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

7011.3.

The registrar shall not assess a civil penalty against a licensed contractor who has been assessed a specified civil penalty by the Labor Commissioner under Section 1020 or 1022 of the Labor Code for the same offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 327, Sec. 5.   Effective June 30, 1982.)
-------------------------------------------

7011.4.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 7011, there is in the Contractors State License Board, a separate enforcement division that shall rigorously enforce this chapter prohibiting all forms of unlicensed activity and shall enforce the obligation to secure the payment of valid and current workers’ compensation insurance in accordance with Section 3700.5 of the Labor Code.
